Illinois, session 104th, HB4348.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Toll Highway Act is amended by changing 5Section 19 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 10/19)  (from Ch. 121, par. 100-19)7    Sec. 19. Toll rates. The Authority shall fix and revise 8from time to time, tolls or charges or rates for the privilege 9of using each of the toll highways constructed pursuant to 10this Act. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted at rates 11calculated to provide the lowest reasonable toll rates that 12will provide funds sufficient with other revenues of the 13Authority to pay, (a) the cost of the construction of a toll 14highway authorized by joint resolution of the General Assembly 15pursuant to Section 14.1 and the reconstruction, major repairs 16or improvements of toll highways, (b) the cost of maintaining, 17repairing, regulating and operating the toll highways 18including only the necessary expenses of the Authority, and 19(c) the principal of all bonds, interest thereon and all 20sinking fund requirements and other requirements provided by 21resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds as they 22shall become due. In fixing the toll rates pursuant to this 23Section 19 and Section 10(c) of this Act, the Authority shall   HB4348- 2 -LRB104 15824 LNS 29030 b1take into account the effect of the provisions of this Section 219 permitting the use of the toll highway system without 3payment of the covenants of the Authority contained in the 4resolutions and trust indentures authorizing the issuance of 5bonds of the Authority. No such provision permitting the use 6of the toll highway system without payment of tolls after the 7date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 8be applied in a manner that impairs the rights of bondholders 9pursuant to any resolution or trust indentures authorizing the 10issuance of bonds of the Authority. The use and disposition of 11any sinking or reserve fund shall be subject to such 12regulation as may be provided in the resolution or trust 13indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds. Subject to 14the provisions of any resolution or trust indenture 15authorizing the issuance of bonds any moneys in any such 16sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year's 17interest on the bonds then outstanding secured by such sinking 18fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All 19such bonds so redeemed or purchased shall forthwith be 20cancelled and shall not again be issued. The Authority shall 21not charge a toll for a motor vehicle of the first division, as 22defined in the Illinois Vehicle Code, pulling a trailer, as 23defined in the Illinois Vehicle Code, with no more than 2 axles 24at a rate higher than an amount calculated by multiplying the 25toll charged to passenger vehicles using an I-PASS device by 26the total number of axles on the trailer. This toll rate set by   HB4348- 3 -LRB104 15824 LNS 29030 b1this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly applies to 2both a driver who uses an I-PASS device and a driver who uses 3cash to pay tolls. No person shall be permitted to use any toll 4highway without paying the toll established under this Section 5except when on official Toll Highway Authority business which 6includes police and other emergency vehicles. However, any law 7enforcement agency vehicle, fire department vehicle, public or 8private ambulance service vehicle engaged in the performance 9of an emergency service or duty that necessitates the use of 10the toll highway system, or other emergency vehicle that is 11plainly marked shall not be required to pay a toll to use a 12toll highway. A law enforcement, fire protection, or emergency 13services officer driving a law enforcement, fire protection, 14emergency services agency vehicle, or public or private 15ambulance service vehicle engaging in the performance of 16emergency services or duties that is not plainly marked must 17present an Official Permit Card which the law enforcement, 18fire protection, or emergency services officer receives from 19his or her law enforcement, fire protection, emergency 20services agency, or public or private ambulance service in 21order to use a toll highway without paying the toll. A law 22enforcement, fire protection, emergency services agency, or 23public or private ambulance service engaging in the 24performance of emergency services or duties must apply to the 25Authority to receive a permit, and the Authority shall adopt 26rules for the issuance of a permit, that allows public or   HB4348- 4 -LRB104 15824 LNS 29030 b1private ambulance service vehicles engaged in the performance 2of emergency services or duties that necessitate the use of 3the toll highway system and all law enforcement, fire 4protection, or emergency services agency vehicles of the law 5enforcement, fire protection, or emergency services agency to 6use any toll highway without paying the toll established under 7this Section. The Authority shall maintain in its office a 8list of all persons that are authorized to use any toll highway 9without charge when on official business of the Authority and 10such list shall be open to the public for inspection. In 11recognition of the unique role of public transportation in 12providing effective transportation in the Authority's service 13region, and to give effect to the exemption set forth in 14subsection (b) of Section 2.06 of the Regional Transportation 15Authority Act, the following vehicles may use any toll highway 16without paying the toll: (1) a vehicle owned or operated by the 17Suburban Bus Division of the Regional Transportation Authority 18that is being used to transport passengers for hire; and (2) 19any revenue vehicle that is owned or operated by a Mass Transit 20District created under Section 3 of the Local Mass Transit 21District Act and running regular scheduled service. 22    Among other matters, this amendatory Act of 1990 is 23intended to clarify and confirm the prior intent of the 24General Assembly to allow toll revenues from the toll highway 25system to be used to pay a portion of the cost of the 26construction of the North-South Toll Highway authorized by   HB4348- 5 -LRB104 15824 LNS 29030 b1Senate Joint Resolution 122 of the 83rd General Assembly in 21984.3(Source: P.A. 100-739, eff. 1-1-19.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.